Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 3226.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3226.1. A. ABUSIVE DISCOVERY. In addition to the
protective orders that a court may issue pursuant to paragraph 1 of
subsection C of Section 3226 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title, a protective order may be issued by the court
authorizing or denying discovery in the court in which the action is
pending. A protective order may also be authorized on matters
relating to a deposition. The order may be issued upon a motion by
Req. No. 12624 Page 1

a pa rty or the person from whom discovery is sought. The motion
shall be accompanied by a certification that the movant has in good
faith conferred or attempted to confer, either in person or by
telephone, with other affected parties in an effort to resolve the
dispute without court action. Upon receipt by the court of the
motion and certification, the court may enter the protective order
authorizing or denying the discovery upon a finding that justice
requires a party or person be protected from annoyance, harassment,
embarrassment, oppression or undue delay, burden, or expense.
B. DEPOSITION OF HIGH-RANKING OFFICER. 1. The court shall
find good cause to issue a protective order to prevent the
deposition of an officer of an organization if the party or person
seeking the protective order demonstrates that the officer sought to
be deposed:
a. is a current or former high-ranking officer of a
government entity or any other organization, public or
private, that is large and complex,
b. has unique and extensive scheduling demands or
responsibilities, and
c. lacks unique, personal knowledge of the issues being
litigated.
The party or person seeking the protective order shall file a
motion, accompanied by an affidavit or declaration of the officer,
establishing these requirements and identifying a person within the
Req. No. 12624 Page 2

orga nization who has knowledge of the subject matter involved in the
pending act.
2. If the party or person demonstrates the requirements in
paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section, the court shall issue a
protective order to prevent the deposition of that officer unless
the opposing party seeking the deposition demonstrates that:
a. it has exhausted all other reasonable means of
discovery,
b. such discovery is inadequate, and
c. the officer has unique, personal knowledge of
discoverable information.
3. To the extent that the party or person seeking the
protective order shows that the officer lacks unique, personal
knowledge of some, but not all, matters relevant to the subject
matter involved in the pending action, the court may limit the scope
of the deposition accordingly.
4. The court may vacate or modify the protective order if,
after additional discovery, the party seeking the deposition can
meet its burden under this subsection.
C. AWARD OF EXPENSES OF MOTION. If the motion is granted, the
court may, after opportunity for hearing, require the party or
person whose conduct necessitated the motion or the party or
attorney advising such conduct or both of them to pay to the moving
party the reasonable expenses incurred in obtaining the order,
Req. No. 12624 Page 3

incl uding attorney fees, unless the court finds that the opposition
to the motion was substantially justified or that other
circumstances make an award of expenses unjust.
If the motion is denied, the court may, after opportunity for
hearing, require the moving party or the attorney advising the
motion or both of them to pay to the party or deponent who opposed
the motion the reasonable expenses incurred in opposing the motion,
including attorney fees, unless the court finds that the making of
the motion was substantially justified or that other circumstances
make an award of expenses unjust.
If the motion is granted in part and denied in part, the court
may apportion the reasonable expenses incurred in relation to the
motion among the parties and persons in a just manner.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12624 AQH 02/13/25








Req. No. 12624 Page 4